apertium_ben_in_canonical_forms.dix
<pardef n="KA/__v">


<!-- verbal noun -->
<e><p><l>nA</l><r>nA<s n="cat:vn"/><s n="case:d"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l>ne</l><r>nA<s n="cat:vn"/><s n="case:o"/></r></p></e>


<e><p><l>wA_huA</l><r><s n="cat:v"/><s n="gen:m"/><s n="num:s" /><s n="case:d"/><s n="tam:adj_wA_huA"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l>we_hue</l><r><s n="cat:v"/><s n="gen:m"/><s n="num:p" /><s n="case:d"/><s n="tam:adj_wA_huA"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l>we_hue</l><r><s n="cat:v"/><s n="gen:m"/><s n="num:s" /><s n="case:o"/><s n="tam:adj_wA_huA"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l>we_hue</l><r><s n="cat:v"/><s n="gen:m"/><s n="num:p" /><s n="case:o"/><s n="tam:adj_wA_huA"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l>wI_huI</l><r><s n="cat:v"/><s n="gen:f"/><s n="num:s" /><s n="case:d"/><s n="tam:adj_wA_huA"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l>wI_huI</l><r><s n="cat:v"/><s n="gen:f"/><s n="num:p" /><s n="case:d"/><s n="tam:adj_wA_huA"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l>wI_huI</l><r><s n="cat:v"/><s n="gen:f"/><s n="num:s" /><s n="case:o"/><s n="tam:adj_wA_huA"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l>wI_huI</l><r><s n="cat:v"/><s n="gen:f"/><s n="num:p" /><s n="case:o"/><s n="tam:adj_wA_huA"/></r></p></e>

<e><p><l>yA_huA</l><r><s n="cat:v"/><s n="gen:m"/><s n="num:s" /><s n="case:d"/><s n="tam:adj_yA_huA"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l>ye_hue</l><r><s n="cat:v"/><s n="gen:m"/><s n="num:p" /><s n="case:d"/><s n="tam:adj_yA_huA"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l>ye_hue</l><r><s n="cat:v"/><s n="gen:m"/><s n="num:s" /><s n="case:o"/><s n="tam:adj_yA_huA"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l>ye_hue</l><r><s n="cat:v"/><s n="gen:m"/><s n="num:p" /><s n="case:o"/><s n="tam:adj_yA_huA"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l>I_huI</l><r><s n="cat:v"/><s n="gen:f"/><s n="num:s" /><s n="case:d"/><s n="tam:adj_yA_huA"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l>I_huI</l><r><s n="cat:v"/><s n="gen:f"/><s n="num:p" /><s n="case:d"/><s n="tam:adj_yA_huA"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l>I_huI</l><r><s n="cat:v"/><s n="gen:f"/><s n="num:s" /><s n="case:o"/><s n="tam:adj_yA_huA"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l>I_huI</l><r><s n="cat:v"/><s n="gen:f"/><s n="num:p" /><s n="case:o"/><s n="tam:adj_yA_huA"/></r></p></e>




<e><p><l>we_hue</l><r><s n="cat:v"/><s n="gen:m"/><s n="num:s"/><s n="per:u"/><s n="tam:adv_we_hue"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l>we_hue</l><r><s n="cat:v"/><s n="gen:f"/><s n="num:s"/><s n="per:u"/><s n="tam:adv_we_hue"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l>we_hue</l><r><s n="cat:v"/><s n="gen:m"/><s n="num:s"/><s n="per:m"/><s n="tam:adv_we_hue"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l>we_hue</l><r><s n="cat:v"/><s n="gen:f"/><s n="num:s"/><s n="per:m"/><s n="tam:adv_we_hue"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l>we_hue</l><r><s n="cat:v"/><s n="gen:m"/><s n="num:s"/><s n="per:m_h"/><s n="tam:adv_we_hue"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l>we_hue</l><r><s n="cat:v"/><s n="gen:f"/><s n="num:s"/><s n="per:m_h"/><s n="tam:adv_we_hue"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l>we_hue</l><r><s n="cat:v"/><s n="gen:m"/><s n="num:s"/><s n="per:a"/><s n="tam:adv_we_hue"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l>we_hue</l><r><s n="cat:v"/><s n="gen:f"/><s n="num:s"/><s n="per:a"/><s n="tam:adv_we_hue"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l>we_hue</l><r><s n="cat:v"/><s n="gen:m"/><s n="num:p"/><s n="per:u"/><s n="tam:adv_we_hue"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l>we_hue</l><r><s n="cat:v"/><s n="gen:f"/><s n="num:p"/><s n="per:u"/><s n="tam:adv_we_hue"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l>we_hue</l><r><s n="cat:v"/><s n="gen:m"/><s n="num:p"/><s n="per:m"/><s n="tam:adv_we_hue"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l>we_hue</l><r><s n="cat:v"/><s n="gen:f"/><s n="num:p"/><s n="per:m"/><s n="tam:adv_we_hue"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l>we_hue</l><r><s n="cat:v"/><s n="gen:m"/><s n="num:p"/><s n="per:m_h"/><s n="tam:adv_we_hue"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l>we_hue</l><r><s n="cat:v"/><s n="gen:f"/><s n="num:p"/><s n="per:m_h"/><s n="tam:adv_we_hue"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l>we_hue</l><r><s n="cat:v"/><s n="gen:m"/><s n="num:p"/><s n="per:a"/><s n="tam:adv_we_hue"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l>we_hue</l><r><s n="cat:v"/><s n="gen:f"/><s n="num:p"/><s n="per:a"/><s n="tam:adv_we_hue"/></r></p></e>




<e><p><l>we_rahanA_hE</l><r><s n="cat:v"/><s n="gen:m"/><s n="num:s"/><s n="per:u"/><s n="tam:we_rahanA_hE"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l>we_rahanA_hE</l><r><s n="cat:v"/><s n="gen:f"/><s n="num:s"/><s n="per:u"/><s n="tam:we_rahanA_hE"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l>we_rahanA_hE</l><r><s n="cat:v"/><s n="gen:m"/><s n="num:s"/><s n="per:m"/><s n="tam:we_rahanA_hE"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l>we_rahanA_hE</l><r><s n="cat:v"/><s n="gen:f"/><s n="num:s"/><s n="per:m"/><s n="tam:we_rahanA_hE"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l>we_rahanA_hE</l><r><s n="cat:v"/><s n="gen:m"/><s n="num:s"/><s n="per:m_h"/><s n="tam:we_rahanA_hE"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l>we_rahanA_hE</l><r><s n="cat:v"/><s n="gen:f"/><s n="num:s"/><s n="per:m_h"/><s n="tam:we_rahanA_hE"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l>we_rahanA_hE</l><r><s n="cat:v"/><s n="gen:m"/><s n="num:s"/><s n="per:a"/><s n="tam:we_rahanA_hE"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l>we_rahanA_hE</l><r><s n="cat:v"/><s n="gen:f"/><s n="num:s"/><s n="per:a"/><s n="tam:we_rahanA_hE"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l>we_rahanA_hE</l><r><s n="cat:v"/><s n="gen:m"/><s n="num:p"/><s n="per:u"/><s n="tam:we_rahanA_hE"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l>we_rahanA_hE</l><r><s n="cat:v"/><s n="gen:f"/><s n="num:p"/><s n="per:u"/><s n="tam:we_rahanA_hE"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l>we_rahanA_hE</l><r><s n="cat:v"/><s n="gen:m"/><s n="num:p"/><s n="per:m"/><s n="tam:we_rahanA_hE"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l>we_rahanA_hE</l><r><s n="cat:v"/><s n="gen:f"/><s n="num:p"/><s n="per:m"/><s n="tam:we_rahanA_hE"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l>we_rahanA_hE</l><r><s n="cat:v"/><s n="gen:m"/><s n="num:p"/><s n="per:m_h"/><s n="tam:we_rahanA_hE"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l>we_rahanA_hE</l><r><s n="cat:v"/><s n="gen:f"/><s n="num:p"/><s n="per:m_h"/><s n="tam:we_rahanA_hE"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l>we_rahanA_hE</l><r><s n="cat:v"/><s n="gen:m"/><s n="num:p"/><s n="per:a"/><s n="tam:we_rahanA_hE"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l>we_rahanA_hE</l><r><s n="cat:v"/><s n="gen:f"/><s n="num:p"/><s n="per:a"/><s n="tam:we_rahanA_hE"/></r></p></e>




<e><p><l>Uz</l><r><s n="cat:v"/><s n="gen:m"/><s n="num:s"/><s n="per:u"/><s n="tam:subj"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l>Uz</l><r><s n="cat:v"/><s n="gen:f"/><s n="num:s"/><s n="per:u"/><s n="tam:subj"/></r></p></e>
<e r="LR"><p><l>ye</l><r><s n="cat:v"/><s n="gen:m"/><s n="num:s"/><s n="per:m"/><s n="tam:subj"/></r></p></e>
<e r="LR"><p><l>ye</l><r><s n="cat:v"/><s n="gen:f"/><s n="num:s"/><s n="per:m"/><s n="tam:subj"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l>e</l><r><s n="cat:v"/><s n="gen:m"/><s n="num:s"/><s n="per:m"/><s n="tam:subj"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l>e</l><r><s n="cat:v"/><s n="gen:f"/><s n="num:s"/><s n="per:m"/><s n="tam:subj"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l>ie</l><r><s n="cat:v"/><s n="gen:m"/><s n="num:s"/><s n="per:m_h"/><s n="tam:subj"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l>ie</l><r><s n="cat:v"/><s n="gen:f"/><s n="num:s"/><s n="per:m_h"/><s n="tam:subj"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l>ie</l><r><s n="cat:v"/><s n="gen:m"/><s n="num:s"/><s n="per:m_h"/><s n="tam:subj"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l>ie</l><r><s n="cat:v"/><s n="gen:f"/><s n="num:s"/><s n="per:m_h"/><s n="tam:subj"/></r></p></e>
<e r="LR"><p><l>ye</l><r><s n="cat:v"/><s n="gen:m"/><s n="num:s"/><s n="per:a"/><s n="tam:subj"/></r></p></e>
<e r="LR"><p><l>ye</l><r><s n="cat:v"/><s n="gen:f"/><s n="num:s"/><s n="per:a"/><s n="tam:subj"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l>e</l><r><s n="cat:v"/><s n="gen:m"/><s n="num:s"/><s n="per:a"/><s n="tam:subj"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l>e</l><r><s n="cat:v"/><s n="gen:f"/><s n="num:s"/><s n="per:a"/><s n="tam:subj"/></r></p></e>
<e r="LR"><p><l>yeM</l><r><s n="cat:v"/><s n="gen:m"/><s n="num:p"/><s n="per:u"/><s n="tam:subj"/></r></p></e>
<e r="LR"><p><l>yeM</l><r><s n="cat:v"/><s n="gen:f"/><s n="num:p"/><s n="per:u"/><s n="tam:subj"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l>ez</l><r><s n="cat:v"/><s n="gen:m"/><s n="num:p"/><s n="per:u"/><s n="tam:subj"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l>ez</l><r><s n="cat:v"/><s n="gen:f"/><s n="num:p"/><s n="per:u"/><s n="tam:subj"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l>o</l><r><s n="cat:v"/><s n="gen:m"/><s n="num:p"/><s n="per:m"/><s n="tam:subj"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l>o</l><r><s n="cat:v"/><s n="gen:f"/><s n="num:p"/><s n="per:m"/><s n="tam:subj"/></r></p></e>

<e lm="aGA"><i>aGA</i><par n="KA/__v"/></e>
<e lm="A"><i>A</i><par n="KA/__v"/></e>
<e lm="akulA"><i>akulA</i><par n="KA/__v"/></e>
<e lm="apanA"><i>apanA</i><par n="KA/__v"/></e>
<e lm="aXikA"><i>aXikA</i><par n="KA/__v"/></e>
<e lm="azjA"><i>azjA</i><par n="KA/__v"/></e>
<e lm="bacA"><i>bacA</i><par n="KA/__v"/></e>
<e lm="BadakA"><i>BadakA</i><par n="KA/__v"/></e>
<e lm="bahakA"><i>bahakA</i><par n="KA/__v"/></e>
<e lm="bajavA"><i>bajavA</i><par n="KA/__v"/></e>
<e lm="banxA"><i>banxA</i><par n="KA/__v"/></e>
<e lm="BannA"><i>BannA</i><par n="KA/__v"/></e>
<e lm="BaravA"><i>BaravA</i><par n="KA/__v"/></e>
<e lm="basA"><i>basA</i><par n="KA/__v"/></e>
<e lm="bawalA"><i>bawalA</i><par n="KA/__v"/></e>
<e lm="baztavA"><i>baztavA</i><par n="KA/__v"/></e>
<e lm="belavA"><i>belavA</i><par n="KA/__v"/></e>
<e lm="bicakA"><i>bicakA</i><par n="KA/__v"/></e>
<e lm="BijavA"><i>BijavA</i><par n="KA/__v"/></e>
<e lm="BinaBinA"><i>BinaBinA</i><par n="KA/__v"/></e>
<e lm="bixakA"><i>bixakA</i><par n="KA/__v"/></e>
<e lm="bolavA"><i>bolavA</i><par n="KA/__v"/></e>
<e lm="BugawA"><i>BugawA</i><par n="KA/__v"/></e>
<e lm="bulavA"><i>bulavA</i><par n="KA/__v"/></e>
<e lm="bunavA"><i>bunavA</i><par n="KA/__v"/></e>
<e lm="caDA"><i>caDA</i><par n="KA/__v"/></e>
<e lm="CakA"><i>CakA</i><par n="KA/__v"/></e>
<e lm="CalakA"><i>CalakA</i><par n="KA/__v"/></e>
<e lm="camakA"><i>camakA</i><par n="KA/__v"/></e>
<e lm="CapA"><i>CapA</i><par n="KA/__v"/></e>
<e lm="catA"><i>catA</i><par n="KA/__v"/></e>
<e lm="cidacidA"><i>cidacidA</i><par n="KA/__v"/></e>
<e lm="CiwarA"><i>CiwarA</i><par n="KA/__v"/></e>
<e lm="culabulA"><i>culabulA</i><par n="KA/__v"/></e>
<e lm="DahA"><i>DahA</i><par n="KA/__v"/></e>
<e lm="digA"><i>digA</i><par n="KA/__v"/></e>
<e lm="gadagadA"><i>gadagadA</i><par n="KA/__v"/></e>
<e lm="GatA"><i>GatA</i><par n="KA/__v"/></e>
<e lm="ginavA"><i>ginavA</i><par n="KA/__v"/></e>
<e lm="gurrA"><i>gurrA</i><par n="KA/__v"/></e>
<e lm="harA"><i>harA</i><par n="KA/__v"/></e>
<e lm="hilA"><i>hilA</i><par n="KA/__v"/></e>
<e lm="jA"><i>jA</i><par n="KA/__v"/></e>
<e lm="jamA"><i>jamA</i><par n="KA/__v"/></e>
<e lm="JilamilA"><i>JilamilA</i><par n="KA/__v"/></e>
<e lm="JulavA"><i>JulavA</i><par n="KA/__v"/></e>
<e lm="kacakA"><i>kacakA</i><par n="KA/__v"/></e>
<e lm="KA"><i>KA</i><par n="KA/__v"/></e>
<e lm="karA"><i>karA</i><par n="KA/__v"/></e>
<e lm="KataKatA"><i>KataKatA</i><par n="KA/__v"/></e>
<e lm="KilaKilA"><i>KilaKilA</i><par n="KA/__v"/></e>
<e lm="kuDA"><i>kuDA</i><par n="KA/__v"/></e>
<e lm="kurakurA"><i>kurakurA</i><par n="KA/__v"/></e>
<e lm="lahakA"><i>lahakA</i><par n="KA/__v"/></e>
<e lm="lapalapA"><i>lapalapA</i><par n="KA/__v"/></e>
<e lm="lazgadA"><i>lazgadA</i><par n="KA/__v"/></e>
<e lm="lOtA"><i>lOtA</i><par n="KA/__v"/></e>
<e lm="maNdarA"><i>maNdarA</i><par n="KA/__v"/></e>
<e lm="mazgA"><i>mazgA</i><par n="KA/__v"/></e>
<e lm="minaminA"><i>minaminA</i><par n="KA/__v"/></e>
<e lm="mutiyA"><i>mutiyA</i><par n="KA/__v"/></e>
<e lm="nirA"><i>nirA</i><par n="KA/__v"/></e>
<e lm="PadavA"><i>PadavA</i><par n="KA/__v"/></e>
<e lm="pakavA"><i>pakavA</i><par n="KA/__v"/></e>
<e lm="paXarA"><i>paXarA</i><par n="KA/__v"/></e>
<e lm="pilapilA"><i>pilapilA</i><par n="KA/__v"/></e>
<e lm="pujavA"><i>pujavA</i><par n="KA/__v"/></e>
<e lm="raKA"><i>raKA</i><par n="KA/__v"/></e>
<e lm="runxavA"><i>runxavA</i><par n="KA/__v"/></e>
<e lm="sarakA"><i>sarakA</i><par n="KA/__v"/></e>
<e lm="siJA"><i>siJA</i><par n="KA/__v"/></e>
<e lm="sulA"><i>sulA</i><par n="KA/__v"/></e>
<e lm="tahalA"><i>tahalA</i><par n="KA/__v"/></e>
<e lm="tarrA"><i>tarrA</i><par n="KA/__v"/></e>
<e lm="ucatA"><i>ucatA</i><par n="KA/__v"/></e>
<e lm="ulatA"><i>ulatA</i><par n="KA/__v"/></e>
<e lm="wadaPadA"><i>wadaPadA</i><par n="KA/__v"/></e>
<e lm="WapaWapA"><i>WapaWapA</i><par n="KA/__v"/></e>
<e lm="wOlavA"><i>wOlavA</i><par n="KA/__v"/></e>
<e lm="xahakA"><i>xahakA</i><par n="KA/__v"/></e>
<e lm="xaraSA"><i>xaraSA</i><par n="KA/__v"/></e>
<e lm="xOdA"><i>xOdA</i><par n="KA/__v"/></e>
